Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2929
Inpatient treatment program; annual review and progress reports; uncooperative offender; transfer; credit for time in treatment.

(1) The inpatient treatment program operated by the Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct annual reviews of each convicted sex offender in the program and submit annual progress reports to the Department of Correctional Services.

(2) If the offender is uncooperative while in the inpatient treatment program or is found not to be amenable to treatment, the Department of Health and Human Services shall cause the offender to be returned to the Department of Correctional Services in accordance with procedures established by the Department of Health and Human Services. The Department of Correctional Services shall be responsible for physical transfer of the offender from the inpatient treatment facility to the Department of Correctional Services. The Department of Health and Human Services shall, at the time of the transfer, provide the Department of Correctional Services a report summarizing the offender's response to and progress while in treatment and the reasons for the transfer and shall provide access to the treatment records as requested by the Department of Correctional Services.

(3) All days of confinement in a treatment program operated by the Department of Health and Human Services shall be credited to the offender's term of imprisonment.

Laws 1992, LB 523, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 645, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 83;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 47.